hu: Babakészítő készlet mellékelt tartozékai: Kiegészítők; Ecsetek; Gombok vagy rögzítők; Ruhadarabok vagy öltözékek; Babatest-öntőforma vagy öntőanyag; Hímzőfonal; Filclapok; Ragasztó; Útmutató; Tűk; Festék; Minta vagy sablon; Előre vágott szövetdarabok; Szalag vagy szegély; Biztonsági szemek; Varrócérna; Cipők; Töltőanyag; Fonal vagy hajszál; Egyéb
th: ส่วนประกอบที่รวมมาในชุดทำตุ๊กตา: ชิ้นส่วนอุปกรณ์เสริม; แปรง; กระดุมหรือตัวติด; ชิ้นส่วนเสื้อผ้าหรือชุด; แม่พิมพ์ตัวตุ๊กตาหรือวัสดุหล่อ; ไหมปัก; แผ่นสักหลาด; กาว; คู่มือ; เข็ม; สี; แพทเทิร์นหรือเทมเพลต; ชิ้นผ้าตัดสำเร็จ; ริบบิ้นหรือขอบตกแต่ง; ตาพลาสติก; ด้ายเย็บผ้า; รองเท้า; วัสดุยัดไส้หรือเติม; ไหมพรมหรือเส้นใยผม; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no kit de fabrico de bonecas: Peças de acessórios; Pincéis; Botões ou fechos; Peças de roupa ou visuais; Molde do corpo de boneca ou material de fundição; Linha de bordar; Folhas de feltro; Cola ou adesivo; Instruções; Agulhas; Tinta; Molde ou modelo; Peças de tecido pré-cortadas; Fita ou enfeite; Olhos de segurança; Linha de coser; Sapatos; Enchimento; Lã ou fibra de cabelo; Outro
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα σετ κατασκευής κούκλας: Αξεσουάρ; Πινέλα/βούρτσες; Κουμπιά ή κουμπώματα; Κομμάτια ρούχων ή συνόλων; Καλούπι σώματος κούκλας ή υλικό χύτευσης; Νήμα κεντήματος; Φύλλα τσόχας; Κόλλα; Οδηγίες; Βελόνες; Χρώματα; Πατρόν ή πρότυπο; Προκομμένα κομμάτια υφάσματος; Κορδέλες ή τρέσες; Μάτια ασφαλείας; Κλωστή ραψίματος; Παπούτσια; Υλικό γεμίσματος; Νήμα ή ίνες μαλλιών; Άλλο
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des Puppenherstellungspakets: Zubehörteile; Pinsel; Knöpfe oder Verschlüsse; Kleidungs- oder Outfitteile; Puppenkörperform oder Gussmaterial; Stickgarn; Filzplatten; Kleber oder Klebstoff; Anleitung; Nadeln; Farbe; Schnittmuster oder Vorlage; Zugeschnittene Stoffteile; Band oder Besatz; Sicherheitsaugen; Nähgarn; Schuhe; Füllmaterial; Garn oder Haarfasern; Sonstige
ru: Состав набора для изготовления кукол: Аксессуары; Кисти; Пуговицы или застежки; Детали одежды или нарядов; Форма для тела куклы или материал для литья; Нитки мулине; Листы фетра; Клей или клейкая лента; Инструкции; Иглы; Краска; Выкройка или шаблон; Предварительно нарезанные куски ткани; Лента или тесьма; Глаза на безопасном креплении; Швейные нитки; Обувь; Набивка или наполнитель; Пряжа или волокна для волос; Другое
fi: Nukentekosetin sisältämät osat: Asusteet; Siveltimet; Napit tai kiinnikkeet; Vaatteet tai asun osat; Nuken kehon muotti tai valumateriaali; Kirjontalanka; Huopa-arkit; Liima tai kiinnitysaine; Ohjeet; Neulat; Maali; Kaava tai malli; Valmiiksi leikatut kangaspalat; Nauha tai reunus; Turvasilmät; Ompelulanka; Kengät; Täyte; Lanka tai hiuskuitu; Muu
nb: Inkluderte komponenter i dukkemakersett: Tilbehørsdeler; Børster; Knapper eller fester; Klær eller antrekksdeler; Form til dukkekropp eller støpemateriale; Broderigarn; Filtark; Lim eller klebemiddel; Instruksjoner; Nåler; Maling; Mønster eller mal; Ferdigkuttede stoffstykker; Bånd eller dekor; Sikkerhetsøyne; Sytråd; Sko; Fyllmasse; Garn eller hårfiber; Annet
da: Sætkomponenter til dukkefremstilling medfølger: Tilbehørsdele; Pensler/børster; Knapper eller lukkemekanismer; Tøj- eller dragtdele; Dukkekropsform eller støbemateriale; Broderigarn; Filtark; Lim eller klæbemiddel; Vejledning; Nåle; Maling; Mønster eller skabelon; Forskårne stofstykker; Bånd eller pynt; Sikkerhedsøjne; Sytråd; Sko; Fyldmateriale; Garn eller hårfibre; Andet
sv: Delar som ingår i dollkit: Tillbehörsdelar; Borstar/penslar; Knappar eller fästelement; Kläder eller outfitdelar; Dockkroppsform eller gjutmaterial; Broderigarn; Filtark; Lim eller klister; Instruktioner; Nålar; Färg; Mönster eller mall; Förklippta tygbitar; Band eller kantband; Säkerhetsögon; Sytråd; Skor; Stoppning eller fyllning; Garn eller hårfiber; Övrigt
zh-CN: 包括娃娃制作套件组件: 配件; 画笔; 纽扣或紧固件; 服饰配件; 娃娃身体模具或铸造材料; 绣花线; 毡片; 胶水或粘合剂; 说明书; 针; 颜料; 图案或模板; 预剪裁布片; 丝带或饰边; 安全眼; 缝纫线; 鞋子; 填充物; 纱线或头发纤维; 其他
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos no kit para confecção de bonecas: Peças de acessórios; Pincéis; Botões ou fechos; Peças de roupa ou traje; Molde do corpo da boneca ou material de fundição; Fio de bordar; Folhas de feltro; Cola ou adesivo; Instruções; Agulhas; Tinta; Molde ou modelo; Peças de tecido pré-cortadas; Fita ou enfeite; Olhos de segurança; Linha de costura; Sapatos; Enchimento; Lã ou fibra de cabelo; Outro
zh-TW: 包含娃娃製作套件組件: 配件; 刷具; 鈕扣或扣件; 服裝或穿搭單品; 娃娃身體模具或鑄造材料; 繡線; 毛氈片; 膠水或黏合劑; 說明; 針; 顏料; 圖案或範本; 預裁布片; 緞帶或飾邊; 安全眼睛; 縫紉線; 鞋子; 填充物; 毛線或頭髮纖維; 其他
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen poppenmaakset: Accessoires; Penselen; Knopen of sluitingen; Kleding- of outfitstukken; Vorm voor poppenlichaam of gietmateriaal; Borduurgaren; Vellen vilt; Lijm of kleefmiddel; Instructies; Naalden; Verf; Patroon of template; Voorgesneden stofstukken; Lint of sierrand; Veiligheidsogen; Naaigaren; Schoenen; Vulling; Garen of haarvezel; Overig
fr: Composants inclus dans le kit de fabrication de poupées: Accessoires; Pinceaux; Boutons ou attaches; Vêtements ou éléments de tenue; Moule de corps de poupée ou matériel de moulage; Fil à broder; Feuilles de feutrine; Colle ou adhésif; Instructions; Aiguilles; Peinture; Patron ou modèle; Pièces de tissu prédécoupées; Ruban ou garniture; Yeux de sécurité; Fil de couture; Chaussures; Rembourrage ou garnissage; Laine ou fibre capillaire; Autre
ko: 인형 만들기 키트 구성품 포함: 액세서리 피스; 브러시; 버튼 또는 패스너; 의류 또는 의상 피스; 인형 바디 몰드 또는 캐스팅 재료; 자수실; 펠트 시트; 접착제; 설명서; 바늘; 페인트; 패턴 또는 템플릿; 사전 재단 패브릭 피스; 리본 또는 트림; 안전 눈; 재봉실; 신발; 스터핑 또는 충전재; 털실 또는 헤어 섬유; 기타
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys lėlės kūrimo rinkinio komponentai: Priedų dalys; Teptukai; Sagos arba užsegimai; Drabužių ar aprangos dalys; Lėlės kūno forma arba liejimo medžiaga; Siuvinėjimo siūlai; Veltinio lakštai; Klijai arba lipnios medžiagos; Instrukcijos; Adatos; Dažai; Raštas arba šablonas; Iš anksto sukarpytos audinio dalys; Kaspinai arba apvadai; Saugios akys; Siuvimo siūlai; Batai; Kamšalas arba užpildas; Verpalai arba plaukų pluoštas; Kita
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm trong bộ dụng cụ làm búp bê: Các mảnh phụ kiện; Cọ vẽ; Cúc hoặc móc cài; Các mảnh quần áo hoặc trang phục; Khuôn hoặc vật liệu đúc thân búp bê; Chỉ thêu; Tấm nỉ; Keo hoặc chất kết dính; Hướng dẫn; Kim; Sơn; Mẫu hình hoặc mẫu; Các mảnh vải cắt sẵn; Ruy băng hoặc viền trang trí; Mắt nhựa an toàn; Chỉ may; Giày; Bông nhồi hoặc vật liệu nhồi; Sợi len hoặc sợi tóc; Khác
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплект за изработка на кукли: Аксесоарни части; Четки; Копчета или закопчалки; Части за дрехи или тоалети; Калъп за тяло на кукла или материал за отливане; Конец за бродерия; Листове филц; Лепило или адхезив; Инструкции; Игли; Боя; Кройка или шаблон; Предварително изрязани парчета плат; Панделка или кант; Безопасни очи; Конец за шиене; Обувки; Пълнеж; Прежда или влакна за коса; Друго
sl-SI: Vključeni sestavni deli kompleta za izdelavo punčk: Dodatki; Čopiči; Gumbi ali zaponke; Kosi oblačil ali opreme; Kalup za telo lutke ali material za vlivanje; Preja za vezenje; Kosi polsti; Lepilo ali lepilno sredstvo; Navodila; Šivanke; Barva; Vzorec ali predloga; Vnaprej narezani kosi blaga; Trak ali obroba; Varnostne oči; Sukanec; Čevlji; Polnilo; Preja ali lasna vlakna; Drugo
ja: ドールメイキングキットコンポーネント付き: アクセサリーパーツ; ブラシ; ボタンまたは留め具; 服または衣装パーツ; ドールボディの型または鋳造材料; 刺繍糸; フェルトシート; 接着剤; 説明書; 針; 絵の具; 型紙またはテンプレート; カット済み生地パーツ; リボンまたはトリム; セーフティアイ; 縫い糸; 靴; 詰め物; 毛糸または髪用繊維; その他
en: Doll making kit components included: Accessory pieces; Brushes; Buttons or fasteners; Clothing or outfit pieces; Doll body mold or casting material; Embroidery floss; Felt sheets; Glue or adhesive; Instructions; Needles; Paint; Pattern or template; Pre-cut fabric pieces; Ribbon or trim; Safety eyes; Sewing thread; Shoes; Stuffing or filling; Yarn or hair fiber; Other
es: Componentes del kit para hacer muñecas: Piezas de accesorios; Pinceles; Botones o cierres; Ropa o piezas de atuendo; Molde del cuerpo de la muñeca o material de fundición; Hilo de bordar; Láminas de fieltro; Pegamento o adhesivo; Instrucciones; Agujas; Pintura; Patrón o plantilla; Piezas de tela precortadas; Cinta o ribete; Ojos de seguridad; Hilo de coser; Zapatos; Relleno; Lana o fibra capilar; Otro
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu do tworzenia lalek: Akcesoria; Pędzle; Guziki lub zapięcia; Elementy odzieży lub strojów; Forma ciała lalki lub materiał do odlewania; Mulina; Arkusze filcu; Klej; Instrukcje; Igły; Farba; Wzór lub szablon; Wstępnie przycięte kawałki materiału; Wstążka lub lamówka; Bezpieczne oczy; Nić do szycia; Buty; Wypychanie lub wypełnienie; Włóczka lub włókna do włosów; Inne
ro-RO: Componente incluse în kitul de fabricare a păpușilor: Piese accesorii; Pensule; Nasturi sau elemente de fixare; Piese de îmbrăcăminte sau ținute; Matriță pentru corp de păpușă sau material de turnare; Ață de brodat; Coli de fetru; Lipici sau adeziv; Instrucțiuni; Ace; Vopsea; Tipar sau șablon; Bucăți de material pre-tăiate; Panglică sau ornament; Ochi de siguranță; Ață de cusut; Pantofi; Umplutură; Ață sau fibră pentru păr; Altele
it: Componenti del kit di creazione bambola inclusi: Accessori; Pennelli; Bottoni o chiusure; Vestiti o completi; Stampo per il corpo della bambola o materiale da colata; Filo da ricamo; Fogli di feltro; Colla o adesivo; Istruzioni; Aghi; Colori; Cartamodello o modello; Pezzi di tessuto pretagliati; Nastri o passamaneria; Occhi di sicurezza; Filo da cucito; Scarpe; Imbottitura o riempimento; Filato o fibra per capelli; Altro
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí súpravy na výrobu bábik: Doplnky; Štetce; Gombíky alebo upevňovacie prvky; Oblečenie alebo časti outfitu; Forma na telo bábiky alebo odlievací materiál; Vyšívacia priadza; Plstené pláty; Lepidlo alebo lepiaca zmes; Návod; Ihly; Farba; Vzor alebo šablóna; Predstrihnuté kusy látky; Stuha alebo lemovanie; Bezpečnostné oči; Nite na šitie; Topánky; Výplň; Priadza alebo vlasové vlákno; Iné
tr: Dahil edilen bebek yapım seti bileşenleri: Aksesuar parçaları; Fırçalar; Düğmeler veya kopçalar; Giyim veya kıyafet parçaları; Bebek gövde kalıbı veya döküm malzemesi; Nakış ipi; Keçe yaprakları; Tutkal veya yapıştırıcı; Talimatlar; İğneler; Boya; Kalıp veya şablon; Önceden kesilmiş kumaş parçaları; Kurdele veya süsleme; Güvenlik gözleri; Dikiş ipliği; Ayakkabılar; Dolgu malzemesi; İplik veya saç lifi; Diğer
hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta za izradu lutke: Dodaci; Četkice; Gumbi ili kopče; Komadi odjeće; Kalup za tijelo lutke ili materijal za lijevanje; Konac za vez; Listovi filca; Ljepilo; Upute; Igle; Boja; Kroj ili predložak; Unaprijed izrezani komadi tkanine; Vrpca ili obrub; Sigurnosne oči; Konac za šivanje; Cipele; Punjenje; Pređa ili vlakna za kosu; Ostalo
cs: Součásti sady na výrobu panenek: Doplňky; Štětce; Knoflíky nebo zapínání; Oblečení nebo části outfitu; Forma na tělo panenky nebo odlévací hmota; Vyšívací bavlnka; Plstěné archy; Lepidlo; Návod; Jehly; Barvy; Střih nebo šablona; Předřezané kusy látky; Stuha nebo prýmky; Bezpečnostní očka; Šicí nit; Boty; Výplň; Příze nebo vlasová vlákna; Ostatní